Utah statutes.
41-6a-1625.   Horns and warning devices -- Emergency vehicles.
(1) (a)  A motor vehicle operated on a highway shall be equipped with a horn
or other warning device in good working order.
(b)  The horn or other warning device:
(i)  shall be capable of emitting sound audible under normal conditions from a
distance of not less than 200 feet; and
(ii)  may not emit an unreasonably loud or harsh sound or a whistle.
(c)  The operator of a motor vehicle:
(i)  when reasonably necessary to insure safe operation, shall give audible
warning with the horn; and
(ii)  except as provided under Subsection (1)(c)(i), may not use the horn on a
highway.
(2)  Except as provided under this section, a vehicle may not be equipped with
and a person may not use on a vehicle a siren, whistle, or bell.
(3) (a)  A vehicle may be equipped with a theft alarm signal device if it is
arranged so that it cannot be used by the operator as an ordinary warning
signal.
(b)  A theft alarm signal device may:
(i)  use a whistle, bell, horn or other audible signal; and
(ii)   not use a siren.
(4) (a)  An authorized emergency vehicle shall be equipped with a siren,
whistle, or bell capable of emitting sound audible under normal conditions
from a distance of not less than 500 feet.
(b)  The type of sound shall be approved by the department based on standards
adopted by rules under Section 41-6a-1601.
(c)  The siren on an authorized emergency vehicle may not be used except:
(i)  when the vehicle is operated in response to an emergency call; or
(ii)  in the immediate pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law.
(d)  The operator of an authorized emergency vehicle shall sound the siren in
accordance with this section when reasonably necessary to warn pedestrians and
other vehicle operators of the approach of the authorized emergency vehicle.
